Washington statutes.
RCW 43.88.058

Maintenance level costs—Services for children.

For the purposes of this chapter, expenditures for the following services must be forecasted and budgeted as maintenance level costs:

(1) Behavioral rehabilitation services placements;

(2) Social worker and related staff to receive, refer, and respond to screened-in reports of child abuse or neglect;

(3) Court-ordered parent-child and sibling visitations delivered by contractors;

(4) Those activities currently being treated as maintenance level costs for budgeting or forecasting purposes on June 7, 2018, including, but not limited to: (a) Adoption support and other adoption-related expenses; (b) foster care maintenance payments; (c) child-placing agency management fees; (d) support goods such as clothing vouchers; (e) child aides; and (f) child care for children in foster or relative placements when the caregiver is at work or in school; and

(5) Developmental disability waiver slots that are anticipated to be utilized by individuals eligible for a medicaid waiver service under RCW 71A.12.370.

[ 2023 c 345 s 2; 2021 c 334 s 1904; 2018 c 208 s 5.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.